Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1137.
do enact as follows:AB1137,13Section 1. 704.17 (1p) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1137,2,64704.17 (1p) (a) If a month-to-month tenant or a week-to-week tenant fails to 1pay rent when due, the tenant’s tenancy is terminated if the landlord gives the 2tenant notice requiring the tenant to pay rent or vacate on or before a date at least 35 30 days after the giving of the notice and if the tenant fails to pay accordingly. A 4month-to-month tenancy is terminated if the landlord, while the tenant is in 5default in payment of rent, gives the tenant notice requiring the tenant to vacate on 6or before a date at least 14 days after the giving of the notice.AB1137,27Section 2. 704.17 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1137,2,188704.17 (2) (a) If a tenant under a lease for a term of one year or less, or a year-9to-year tenant, fails to pay any installment of rent when due, the tenant’s tenancy is 10terminated if the landlord gives the tenant notice requiring the tenant to pay rent 11or vacate on or before a date at least 5 30 days after the giving of the notice and if 12the tenant fails to pay accordingly. If a tenant has been given such a notice and has 13paid the rent on or before the specified date, or been permitted by the landlord to 14remain in possession contrary to such notice, and if within one year of any prior 15default in payment of rent for which notice was given the tenant fails to pay a 16subsequent installment of rent on time, the tenant’s tenancy is terminated if the 17landlord, while the tenant is in default in payment of rent, gives the tenant notice to 18vacate on or before a date at least 14 days after the giving of the notice.AB1137,319Section 3. 799.40 (1m) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1137,3,320799.40 (1m) Acceptance of rent or other payment. If a landlord 21commences an action under this section against a tenant whose tenancy has been 22terminated for failure to pay rent or for any other reason, the action under this 23section may not shall be dismissed because, and the tenancy reinstated, if the 1landlord accepts tenant, at any time before judgment is entered in the action, pays 2to the landlord all past due rent or and any other payment from the tenant after 3serving notice of default or after commencing the action required by the court.AB1137,3,44